Ohio, session 136, HB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3313.602, 3314.03, 3326.11, and 6
3328.24 be amended and section 3313.6031 of the Revised Code be 7
enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 3313.602. (A) The board of education of each city, 9
local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district 10
shall adopt a policy specifying whether or not oral recitation 11
of the pledge of allegiance to the flag shall be a part of the 12
school's program and, if so, establishing a time and manner for 13
the recitation. However, no board of education shall prohibit a 14
classroom teacher from providing in the teacher's classroom 15
reasonable periods of time for the oral recitation of the pledge 16
of allegiance to the flag. The policy adopted under this 17
division, and a teacher who includes recitation of the pledge in 18

H. B. No. 117 Page 2
As Introduced
the classroom, shall not require any student to participate in 19
the recitation and shall prohibit the intimidation of any 20
student by other students or staff aimed at coercing 21
participation. 22
No board of education or employee of a city, local, 23
exempted village, or joint vocational school district shall 24
alter the words used in the oral recitation of the pledge of 25
allegiance to the flag from the words set forth in 4 U.S.C. 4. 26
(B) In the development of its graded course of study, the 27
board of education of each city and exempted village school 28
district and the governing board of each educational service 29
center shall ensure that the principles of democracy and ethics 30
are emphasized and discussed wherever appropriate in all parts 31
of the curriculum for grades kindergarten through twelve. 32
(C)(B) Each city, local, exempted village, and joint 33
vocational school board shall adopt policies that encourage all 34
certificated and noncertificated employees to be cognizant of 35
their roles in instilling ethical principles and democratic 36
ideals in all district pupils. 37
(D)(C) The board of education of each city, local, joint 38
vocational, chartered community, and exempted village school 39
district, and the Cleveland scholarship and tutoring program, 40
shall require each district school to devote time on or about 41
Veterans' day to an observance that conveys the meaning and 42
significance of that day. The amount of time each school devotes 43
to this observance shall be at least one hour or, in schools 44
that schedule class periods of less than one hour, at least one 45
standard class period. The board shall determine the specific 46
activities to constitute the observance in each school in the 47
district after consultation with the school's administrators. 48

H. B. No. 117 Page 3
As Introduced
Sec. 3313.6031. (A) The board of education of each city, 49
local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district 50
shall adopt a policy establishing a time and manner for the 51
daily recitation of the pledge of allegiance to the flag. The 52
policy shall not require any person to participate in the 53
recitation or otherwise infringe on one's constitutional rights. 54
(B) No board of education or employee of a city, local, 55
exempted village, or joint vocational school district shall 56
alter the words used in the oral recitation of the pledge of 57
allegiance to the flag from the words set forth in 4 U.S.C. 4. 58
(C) In the interests of promoting excellent citizenship 59
skills, schools and teachers are highly encouraged to develop 60
and implement lessons related to the American flag and pledge of 61
allegiance. 62
(D) Each district board shall make its policy adopted 63
under this section publicly available. Each district board shall 64
post its policy on its publicly accessible web site, if it has 65
one. 66
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 67
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 68
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 69
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 70
contract filed with the director under this section. 71
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 72
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 73
following: 74
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 75
following: 76
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 77

H. B. No. 117 Page 4
As Introduced
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 78
2003; 79
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 80
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 81
(2) The education program of the school, including the 82
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 83
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 84
focus of the curriculum; 85
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 86
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 87
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 88
assessments; 89
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 90
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 91
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 92
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 93
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 94
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 95
Code; 96
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 97
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 98
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 99
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 100
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 101
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 102
student. 103
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 104
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 105

H. B. No. 117 Page 5
As Introduced
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 106
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 107
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 108
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 109
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 110
117.10 of the Revised Code. 111
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 112
to be used that contains at least the following information: 113
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 114
instructional purposes; 115
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 116
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 117
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 118
that are paid by the school; 119
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 120
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 121
operator, if any. 122
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 123
following: 124
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 125
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 126
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 127
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 128
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 129
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 130
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 131
any position. 132
(11) That the school will comply with the following 133

H. B. No. 117 Page 6
As Introduced
requirements: 134
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 135
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 136
twenty hours per school year. 137
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 138
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 139
the school. 140
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 141
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 142
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 143
religious institution. 144
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 145
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 146
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 147
3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 148
3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 149
3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 150
3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 151
3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 152
3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 153
3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 154
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 155
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 156
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 157
3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 158
3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 159
3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 160
3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 161
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 162
2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the 163

H. B. No. 117 Page 7
As Introduced
Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply 164
with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner 165
specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. 166
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 167
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 168
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 169
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 170
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 171
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 172
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 173
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 174
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 175
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 176
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 177
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 178
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 179
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 180
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 181
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 182
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 183
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 184
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 185
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 186
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 187
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 188
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 189
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 190
subject area competency adopted by the department under 191
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 192
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 193
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 194

H. B. No. 117 Page 8
As Introduced
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 195
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 196
cooperative education developed by the department under division 197
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 198
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 199
months after the end of each school year a report of its 200
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 201
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 202
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 203
in the school. 204
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 205
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 206
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 207
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 208
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 209
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 210
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 211
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 212
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 213
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 214
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 215
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 216
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 217
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 218
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 219
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 220
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 221
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 222
unless it is either of the following: 223

H. B. No. 117 Page 9
As Introduced
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 224
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 225
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 226
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 227
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 228
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 229
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 230
Revised Code. 231
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 232
to employees; 233
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 234
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 235
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 236
(E) of this section. 237
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 238
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 239
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 240
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 241
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 242
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 243
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 244
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 245
Revised Code; 246
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 247
or part of an existing public school or educational service 248
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 249
a converted public school or service center building, 250
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 251

H. B. No. 117 Page 10
As Introduced
that the board of education or service center governing board 252
that operated the school or building before conversion is 253
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 254
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 255
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 256
agreement applicable to such employees; 257
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 258
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 259
governing authority of the community school; 260
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 261
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 262
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 263
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 264
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 265
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 266
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 267
the district in which the school is located; 268
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 269
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 270
located; 271
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 272
other district in the state. 273
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 274
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 275
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 276
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 277
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 278
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 279
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 280

H. B. No. 117 Page 11
As Introduced
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 281
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 282
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 283
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 284
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 285
(b) The authority of the department as the community 286
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 287
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 288
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 289
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 290
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 291
action. 292
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 293
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 294
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 295
with criteria for student participation established by the 296
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 297
Revised Code; 298
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 299
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 300
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 301
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 302
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 303
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 304
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 305
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 306
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 307
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 308
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 309

H. B. No. 117 Page 12
As Introduced
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 310
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 311
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 312
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 313
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 314
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 315
policies will be available for public inspection; 316
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 317
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 318
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 319
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 320
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 321
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 322
the Revised Code; 323
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 324
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 325
of the following information: 326
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 327
will be used; 328
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 329
be determined and documented; 330
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 331
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 332
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 333
the school will document participation in learning 334
opportunities; 335
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 336
monitored; 337

H. B. No. 117 Page 13
As Introduced
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 338
be protected; 339
(g) A description of the professional development 340
activities that will be offered to teachers. 341
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 342
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 343
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 344
interest at a fair market rate; 345
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 346
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 347
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 348
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 349
contracted. 350
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 351
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 352
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 353
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 354
the parent's or student's primary residence. 355
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 356
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 357
students enrolling in or attending the school. 358
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 359
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 360
following: 361
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 362
school will be selected in the future; 363
(2) The management and administration of the school; 364
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 365

H. B. No. 117 Page 14
As Introduced
school or educational service center building, alternative 366
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 367
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 368
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 369
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 370
of the school; 371
(5) Internal financial controls. 372
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 373
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 374
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 375
authority of the school. 376
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 377
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 378
community school may provide for the community school governing 379
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 380
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 381
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 382
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 383
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 384
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 385
receives from the state. 386
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 387
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 388
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 389
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 390
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 391
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 392
contract; 393
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 394

H. B. No. 117 Page 15
As Introduced
performance and the organization and operation of the community 395
school on at least an annual basis; 396
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 397
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 398
contract; 399
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 400
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 401
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 402
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 403
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 404
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 405
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 406
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 407
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 408
closes prior to the end of a school year. 409
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 410
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 411
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 412
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 413
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 414
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 415
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 416
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 417
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 418
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 419
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 420
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 421
within one year after the contract entered into under this 422
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 423

H. B. No. 117 Page 16
As Introduced
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 424
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 425
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 426
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 427
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 428
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 429
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 430
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 431
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 432
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 433
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 434
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 435
3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 436
3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 437
3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 438
3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 439
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 440
3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 441
3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 442
3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 443
3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 444
3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 445
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 446
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 447
3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 448
3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.90, 449
3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 450
3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 451
3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 452
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 453
2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 454

H. B. No. 117 Page 17
As Introduced
4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 455
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 456
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 457
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 458
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.5318, 459
3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 460
3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 461
3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 462
3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 463
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 464
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 465
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 466
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 467
were a district board of education. 468
Section 2. That existing sections 3313.602, 3314.03, 469
3326.11, and 3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 470
Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle 471
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 472
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 473
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 474
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 475
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 476
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 477
as presented in this act: 478
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 479
H.B. 214, H.B. 250, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 480
all of the 135th General Assembly. 481
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 482
H.B. 47, H.B. 214, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 483

H. B. No. 117 Page 18
As Introduced
all of the 135th General Assembly. 484
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 485
S.B. 208 and S.B. 234 of the 135th General Assembly. 486
Section 4. This act shall be known as The Pledge of 487
Allegiance Act. 488